Hawaii, session 2026, GM1306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that cesspools are a
source of pollution that threatens the health of Hawaii’s people
and environment. In response to the State's cesspool pollution
problem, legislation was enacted in 2017 that requires all
cesspools not exempt by the director of health to be upgraded or
converted to director of health-approved wastewater systems or
connected to sewerage systems by January 1, 2050.
The legislature further finds that the large upfront costs
of cesspool conversions prevent many cesspool owners from
addressing systems that contribute to the daily release of
untreated sewage. It is in the public interest to explore all
financing mechanisms to accelerate cesspool conversions and
provide Hawaii's homeowners with additional financing options,
especially for those not able to qualify for bank and credit
union financing at reasonable rates and terms.
The purpose of this Act is to:
2026-3291 HB1618 GDI HMSO
■■lllflllllillillllHIlil

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(1) Establish a cesspool conversion revolving loan fund
and direct the Hawaii green infrastructure authority
to establish a cesspool conversion financing program
to provide low-interest or forgivable loans for
eligible households to upgrade or convert existing
cesspools in all counties to director of health-
approved wastewater systems or connect properties with
existing cesspools to sewerage systems; and
(2) Allow the department of health, through a memorandum
of agreement, to annually transfer funding available
from the water pollution control revolving fund to
capitalize the cesspool conversion financing program.
SECTION 2. Chapter 196, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part IV to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§196- Cesspool conversion revolving loan fund;
cesspool conversion financing program. (a) There is
established in the state treasury the cesspool conversion
revolving loan fund, which shall be administered by the
authority. Funds deposited into the cesspool conversion
revolving loan fund shall include:
2026-3291 HB1618 CDl HMSO
llllllillilHIillllMli

Page 3 H.B. NO. 1618
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(1) Funds from federal^ county, private, or other funding
sources, including funds from the department of health
under section 342D-83;
(2) Moneys received as repayment of loans and interest
payments; provided that the repayment of loans and
interest payments under this paragraph shall not
include repayment of loans and interest collected as a
result of funds advanced from proceeds of the green
energy market securitization bonds, clean energy and
energy efficiency revolving loan fund, solar
photovoltaic and energy storage loan program, or
condominium loan program; and
(3) Any fees collected by the authority under this
section; provided that moneys collected as a result of
the funds advanced from proceeds of the green energy
market securitization bonds, clean energy and energy
efficiency revolving loan fund, solar photovoltaic and
energy storage loan program, and condominium loan
program shall be kept separate from fees collected as
a result of funds advanced from proceeds of the
cesspool conversion revolving loan fund.
2026-3291 HB1618 CDl HMSO
innHiiliiiiiiiinBiHini

Page 4 H.B. NO 1618
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(b) Moneys in the cesspool conversion revolving loan fund
shall be used to administer the cesspool conversion financing
program to provide low-interest loans or other authorized
financial assistance, including forgivable loans,, to eligible
households, with a preference for low- and moderate-income
households, to upgrade or convert existing cesspools in all
counties to director of health-approved wastewater systems or
connect properties with existing cesspools to sewerage systems
on terms approved by the authority. Moneys from the fund may be
used to cover administrative and legal costs of fund management
and management associated with individual loans, which include
personnel, services, technical assistance, data collection and
reporting, materials, equipment, and travel for the purposes of
this section.
(c) Funds appropriated or authorized from the cesspool
conversion revolving loan fund shall be expended by the
authority. The authority may contract with other public or
private entities for the provision of all or a portion of the
services necessary for the administration and implementation of
the cesspool conversion financing program. The authority may
2026-3291 HB1618 CDl HMSO 4
iiiiiiiiiiHiiiiiiiiin

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
set fees or charges for fund management and technical site
assistance provided under this section.
(d) All interest earned on the loans, deposits, or
investments of the moneys in the fund shall become part of the
cesspool conversion revolving loan fund.
(e) The authority may establish subaccounts within the
cesspool conversion revolving loan fund as necessary.
(f) The authority may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91
or publish cesspool conversion financing program guidelines to
carry out the purposes of this section.
(g) Except as otherwise provided by law, expenditures from
the cesspool conversion revolving loan fund, including
administrative expenditures, may be made by the authority
without appropriation by the legislature or allotment; provided
that no expenditure shall be made from and no obligation shall
be incurred against the fund in excess of the amount standing to
the credit of the fund or for any purpose for which the fund may
not be lawfully expended. Nothing in sections 37-31 through 37-
41 shall require the proceeds of the cesspool conversion
revolving loan fund to be reappropriated annually."
2026-3291 HB1618 CDl HMSO 5

Page 6 1618
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
SECTION 3. Section 196-64, Hawaii Revised Statutes/ is
amended to read as follows:
"§196-64 Functions, powers, and duties of the authority.
(a) In the performance of, and with respect to the functions,
powers, and duties vested in the authority by this part, the
authority, as directed by the director and in accordance with a
green infrastructure loan program order or orders under section
269-171 or an annual plan submitted by the authority pursuant to
this section, as approved by the commission for the green
infrastructure loan program, may:
(1) Make loans and expend funds to finance the purchase or
installation of green infrastructure equipment for
clean energy technology, demand response technology,
and energy use reduction and demand side management
infrastructure, programs, and services;
(2) Hold and invest moneys in the green infrastructure
special fund in investments as permitted by law and in
accordance with approved investment guidelines
established in one or more orders issued by the
commission pursuant to section 269-171;
2026-3291 HB1618 CDl HMSO
nilHIliillllllHIMIIR

. . .
h b no
S',
C.D. 1
(3) Hire employees necessary to perform its duties,
including an executive director. The executive
director shall be appointed by the authority, and the
employees' positions, including the executive
director's position, shall be exempt from chapter 76;
(4) Enter into contracts for the service of consultants
for rendering professional and technical assistance
and advice, and any other contracts that are necessary
and proper for the implementation of the loan program;
(5) Enter into contracts for the administration of the
loan program, without the necessity of complying with
chapter 103D;
(6) Establish loan program guidelines to be approved in
one or more orders issued by the commission pursuant
to section 269-171 to carry out the purposes of this
part;
(7) Be audited at least annually by a firm of independent
certified public accountants selected by the
authority, and provide the results of this audit to
the department and the commission; and
2026-3291 HB1618 CDl HMSO
niiiiiiHiimiiiiHin

Page 8
H.IB . IN 'I O.
g
C.D. 1
(8) Perform all functions necessary to effectuate the
purposes of this part.
(b) The authority shall submit to the commission an annual
plan for the green infrastructure loan program for review and
approval no later than ninety days prior to the start of each
fiscal year. The annual plan submitted by the authority shall
include the authority's projected operational budget for the
succeeding fiscal year.
(c) In the performance of the functions, powers, and
duties vested in the authority by this part, the authority shall
administer the clean energy and energy efficiency revolving loan
fund pursuant to section 196-65.5 and may:
(1) Make loans and expend funds to finance the purchase or
installation of clean energy technology and services;
(2) Implement and administer loan programs on behalf of
other state departments or agencies through a
memorandum of agreement and expend funds appropriated
to the department or agency for purposes authorized by
the legislature;
(3) Utilize all repayment mechanisms, including the green
energy money saver on-bill program, financing tools,
2026-3291 HB1618 GDI HMSO
iiHiiiiiiiiiiiiannw

Page 9
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
servicing and other arrangements, and sources of
capital available to the authority;
(4) Exercise powers to organize and establish special
purpose entities as limited liability companies under
the laws of the State;
(5) Acquire, hold, and sell qualified securities;
(6) Pledge unencumbered net assets, loans receivable,
assigned agreements, and security interests over
equipment financed, as collateral for the authority's
borrowings from federal, county, or private lenders or
agencies;
(7) Utilize the employees of the authority, including the
executive director;
(8) Enter into contracts for the service of consultants
for rendering professional and technical assistance
and advice and any other contracts that are necessary
and proper for the implementation of the loan fund
program;
(9) Enter into contracts for the administration of the
loan fund program exempt from chapter 103D;
(10) Establish loan fund program guidelines;
2026-3291 HB1618 GDI HMSO
niiiiinimnniii

Page 10
H.B. NO.
’ ' S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(11) Be audited at least annually by a firm of independent
certified public accountants selected by the authority
and provide the results of the audit to the department
and legislature; and
(12) Perform all functions necessary to effectuate the
purposes of this part.
(d) In the performance of the functions, powers, and
duties vested in the authority by this part, the authority shall
administer the cesspool conversion revolving loan fund and
cesspool conversion financing program pursuant to section
196-and may:
(1) Make loans and expend funds to finance the upgrade or
conversion of existing cesspools in all counties to
director of health-approved wastewater systems or
connection of properties with existing cesspools to
sewerage systems;
(2) Implement and administer the cesspool conversion
financing program with funding available under section
342D-83 provided by the department of health on an
annual basis through a memorandum of agreement and
2026-3291 HB1618 CDl HMSO 10
■■iininniuiiiiiiii

Page 11 H.B. NO 1618
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
expend funds appropriated to the department for
purposes authorized by the legislature;
(3) Utilize all repayment mechanisms, financing tools,
servicing and other arrangements, and sources of
capital available to the authority;
(4) Utilize the employees of the authority, including the
executive director;
(5) Enter into contracts for the service of consultants
for rendering professional and technical assistance
and advice and any other contracts that are necessary
and proper for the implementation of the cesspool
conversion financing program;
(6) Enter into contracts for the administration of the
cesspool conversion financing program that are exempt
from chapter 103D;
(7) Establish guidelines for the cesspool conversion
financing program;
(8) Be audited at least annually by a firm of independent
certified public accountants selected by the authority
and provide the results of the audit to the department
and legislature; and
2026-3291 HB1618 GDI HMSO 11

Page 12
H.B. NO.
hTi
o.LJ. I
C.D. 1
(9) Perform all functions necessary to effectuate the
purposes of this part.
[-H^] (e) The authority shall submit an annual report for
the clean energy and energy efficiency revolving loan fund a^
the cesspool conversion revolving loan fund to the legislature
no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular
session describing the projects funded and the projected energy
impacts."
SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the Hawaii green
infrastructure special fund the sura of $203,750 or so rauch
thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the
establishment and hiring of one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE)
program management position and for the purposes of the cesspool
conversion revolving loan fund.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii green
infrastructure authority for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect upon its approval;
provided that section 4 shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-3291 HB1618 CDl HMSO 12
iiiiiMiiiiiiniiDii

1618
H.B. NO.
I
W
d
Q
Q
Q
APPROVED this Sth day of July ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1618, HD 1,SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1618, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
164-26